New Jersey, session 221, A786.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the public interest that standards for the provision of paid sick leave be established by uniform Statewide policies because consistency and predictability for employers and employees is critical to economic growth and job creation; and that local control over paid sick leave would lead to patchwork regulation contrary to these goals. 2.    a.   A local unit shall not adopt an ordinance, resolution, or rule or regulation, or take any other action, requiring private employers to provide paid sick leave.  Any ordinance, resolution, rule or regulation, or other action taken requiring such employers to provide paid sick leave shall be against public policy and be null and void.  This section shall not be construed to supersede any statute under which a local unit may include labor requirements in the specifications for a public contract. b.    As used in this section: Local unit means a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the State, or a board, commission, department, or agency of any of the foregoing, but shall not include a school district or regional school district. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.